Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-322.01
Sexual abuse of an inmate, parolee, probationer, or problem solving court participant.

(1) A person commits the offense of sexual abuse of an inmate, a parolee, a probationer, or a problem solving court participant if such person subjects an inmate, a parolee, a probationer, or a problem solving court participant to sexual penetration or sexual contact.

(2) It is not a defense to a charge under this section that the inmate, parolee, probationer, or problem solving court participant consented to such sexual penetration or sexual contact.

(3) An otherwise lawful pat-down or body cavity search by a person is not a violation of this section.

(4) Sexual contact or sexual penetration between spouses is not a violation of this section.

Laws 1999, LB 511, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 155, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 943, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB519, § 7;

Laws 2026, LB965, § 9.
July 18, 2026